District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.45

District of Columbia courts’ budget.

The District of Columbia courts shall prepare and annually submit to the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, for inclusion in the annual budget, annual estimates of the expenditures and appropriations necessary for the maintenance and operation of the District of Columbia court system. The courts shall submit as part of their budgets both a multiyear plan and a multiyear capital improvements plan and shall submit a statement presenting qualitative and quantitative descriptions of court activities and the status of efforts to comply with reports of the Comptroller General of the United States.

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 800, Pub. L. 93-198, title IV, § 445
Aug. 5, 1977, 111 Stat. 753. Pub. L. 105-33, § 11243(a)
1973 Ed., Title 11, appx.
1981 Ed., Title 11, appx., § 445.